Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB925.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XVII-A.2 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a subarticle to read:SUBARTICLE FSAFE PATH RESTRICTED ACCOUNTSection 1751-A.2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Safe Path Restricted Account established under section 1752-A.2."Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.Section 1752-A.2. Safe Path Restricted Account.The Safe Path Restricted Account is established as a restricted account in the General Fund.Section 1753-A.2. Source and use of funds.(a) Transfer.--For fiscal year 2024-2025, the sum of $50,000,000 shall be transferred to the account from the General Fund.(b) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the account is appropriated to the commission on a continuing basis for the purposes under subsection (c).(c) Use of funds.--The commission shall use money in the account to award grants to political subdivisions and nonprofit organizations that establish or operate safe passage programs 20250HB0925PN0973 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 designed to improve safety for youths and adults going to and from schools and community centers. Priority shall be given to applicants in areas that experience high rates of gun violence, as determined by the commission.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0925PN0973 - 3 - 12345